Washington statutes.
RCW 9.54.130

Restoration of stolen property—Duty of officers.

The officer arresting any person charged as principal or accessory in any robbery or larceny shall use reasonable diligence to secure the property alleged to have been stolen, and after seizure shall be answerable therefor while it remains in his or her hands, and shall annex a schedule thereof to his or her return of the warrant.

Whenever the prosecuting attorney shall require such property for use as evidence upon the examination or trial, such officer, upon his or her demand, shall deliver it to him or her and take his or her receipt therefor, after which such prosecuting attorney shall be answerable for the same.

[ 2011 c 336 s 312; 1909 c 249 s 357; RRS s 2609.]